Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE A. HEALTH COVERAGE IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 1207. ENROLLMENT OF MEDICAL ASSISTANCE RECIPIENTS AND CHILDREN ELIGIBLE FOR STATE CHILD HEALTH PLAN

Sec. 1207.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to a group health benefit plan, including a small employer health benefit plan written under Chapter 1501, a plan provided under Chapter 1551, 1575, or 1601, or a successor to a plan provided under one of those chapters, or a medical savings account plan or other health reimbursement arrangement authorized by law, that provides benefits for medical or surgical expenses incurred as a result of a health condition, accident, or sickness, including a group, blanket, or franchise insurance policy or insurance agreement, a group hospital service contract, or a group evidence of coverage or similar group coverage document that is offered by:

(1) an insurance company;

(2) a group hospital service corporation operating under Chapter 842;

(3) a fraternal benefit society operating under Chapter 885;

(4) a stipulated premium company operating under Chapter 884;

(5) a reciprocal exchange operating under Chapter 942;

(6) a health maintenance organization operating under Chapter 843;

(7) a multiple employer welfare arrangement that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 846; or

(8) an approved nonprofit health corporation that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 844.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 11.025(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 1207.002. ENROLLMENT REQUIRED. (a) A group health benefit plan issuer shall permit an individual who is otherwise eligible for enrollment in the plan to enroll in the plan, without regard to any enrollment period restriction, on receipt of written notice from the Health and Human Services Commission that the individual is:

(1) a recipient of medical assistance under the state Medicaid program and is a participant in the health insurance premium payment reimbursement program under Section 32.0422, Human Resources Code; or

(2) a child eligible for the state child health plan under Chapter 62, Health and Safety Code, and eligible to participate in the health insurance premium assistance program under Section 62.059, Health and Safety Code.

(b) A group health benefit plan issuer shall permit an individual who is otherwise eligible for enrollment in the plan to enroll in the plan, without regard to any enrollment period restriction, if the individual:

(1) becomes ineligible for medical assistance under the state Medicaid program or enrollment in the state child health plan under Chapter 62, Health and Safety Code, after initially establishing eligibility; and

(2) provides a written request for enrollment in the group health benefit plan not later than the 30th day after the date the individual's eligibility for the state Medicaid program or the state child health plan terminated.

(c) If an individual described by Subsection (a)(1) or (2) or Subsection (b) is not eligible to enroll in the group health benefit plan unless a family member of the individual is also enrolled in the plan, the plan issuer, on receipt of written notice under Subsection (a) or a written request under Subsection (b), shall enroll both the individual and the family member in the plan.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 11.026(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 268 (S.B. 10), Sec. 24(a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 1207.003. EFFECTIVE DATE OF ENROLLMENT. (a) Unless enrollment occurs during an established enrollment period, enrollment in a group health benefit plan under Section 1207.002 takes effect on:

(1) the eligibility enrollment date specified in the written notice from the Health and Human Services Commission under Section 1207.002(a); or

(2) the first day of the first calendar month that begins at least 30 days after the date written notice or a written request is received by the plan issuer under Section 1207.002(a) or (b), as applicable.

(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), the individual must comply with a waiting period required under the state child health plan under Chapter 62, Health and Safety Code, or under the health insurance premium assistance program under Section 62.059, Health and Safety Code, as applicable.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 11.026(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 268 (S.B. 10), Sec. 24(b), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 1207.004. TERMINATION OF ENROLLMENT. (a) Notwithstanding any other requirement of a group health benefit plan, the plan issuer shall permit an individual who is enrolled in the plan under Section 1207.002(a)(1), and any family member of the individual enrolled under Section 1207.002(c), to terminate enrollment in the plan not later than the 60th day after the date on which the individual provides satisfactory proof to the issuer that the individual is no longer:

(1) a recipient of medical assistance under the state Medicaid program; or

(2) a participant in the health insurance premium payment reimbursement program under Section 32.0422, Human Resources Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other requirement of a group health benefit plan, the plan issuer shall permit an individual who is enrolled in the plan under Section 1207.002(a)(2), and any family member of the individual enrolled under Section 1207.002(c), to terminate enrollment in the plan not later than the 60th day after the date on which the individual provides a written request to disenroll from the plan because the individual no longer wishes to participate in the health insurance premium assistance program under Section 62.059, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 11.026(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 268 (S.B. 10), Sec. 24(c), eff. September 1, 2007.